Nebraska, session 109, LB66.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 30 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act.
Sec. 2. In the Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act:
(1) Advance health-care directive means a power of attorney for
health care, health-care instruction, or both. The term includes an
advance mental health-care directive.
(2) Advance mental health-care directive means a power of attorney
for health care, health-care instruction, or both, created under section
9 of this act.
(3) Agent means an individual appointed under a power of attorney
for health care to make a health-care decision for the individual who
made the appointment. The term includes a co-agent or alternate agent
appointed under section 20 of this act.
(4) Capacity means having capacity under section 3 of this act.
(5) Cohabitant means each of two individuals who have been living
together as a couple for at least one year after each became an adult or
was emancipated and who are not married to each other.
(6) Default surrogate means an individual authorized under section
12 of this act to make a health-care decision for another individual.
(7) Electronic means relating to technology having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar
capabilities.
(8) Family member means a spouse, adult child, parent, or
grandparent, or an adult descendant of a spouse, child, parent, or
grandparent.
(9) Guardian means a person appointed under other law by a court to
make decisions regarding the personal affairs of an individual, which may
include health-care decisions. The term does not include a guardian ad
litem.
(10) Health care means care or treatment or a service or procedure
to maintain, monitor, diagnose, or otherwise affect an individual's
-2-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
physical or mental illness, injury, or condition. The term includes
mental health care.
(11) Health-care decision means a decision made by an individual or
the individual's surrogate regarding the individual's health care,
including:
(A) selection or discharge of a health-care professional or health-
care institution;
(B) approval or disapproval of a diagnostic test, surgical
procedure, medication, therapeutic intervention, or other health care;
and
(C) direction to provide, withhold, or withdraw artificial nutrition
or hydration, mechanical ventilation, or other health care.
(12) Health-care institution means a facility or agency licensed,
certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by other law to provide
health care in this state in the ordinary course of business.
(13) Health-care instruction means a direction, whether or not in a
record, made by an individual that indicates the individual's goals,
preferences, or wishes concerning the provision, withholding, or
withdrawal of health care. The term includes a direction intended to be
effective if a specified condition arises.
(14) Health-care professional means a physician or other individual
licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by other law of
this state to provide health care in this state in the ordinary course of
business or the practice of the physician's or individual's profession.
(15) Individual means an adult or emancipated minor.
(16) Mental health care means care or treatment or a service or
procedure to maintain, monitor, diagnose, or otherwise affect an
individual's mental illness or other psychiatric, psychological, or
psychosocial condition.
(17) Nursing home means a nursing facility as defined in section
1919(a)(1) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1396r(a)(1), as amended,
-3-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
or skilled nursing facility as defined in section 1819(a)(1) of the
Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1395i–3(a)(1), as amended.
(18) Person means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit
entity, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, or other legal entity.
(19) Person interested in the welfare of the individual means:
(A) the individual's surrogate;
(B) a family member of the individual;
(C) the cohabitant of the individual;
(D) a public entity providing health-care case management or
protective services to the individual;
(E) a person appointed under other law to make decisions for the
individual under a power of attorney for finances; or
(F) a person that has an ongoing personal or professional
relationship with the individual, including a person that has provided
educational or health-care services or supported decision making to the
individual.
(20) Physician means an individual authorized to practice as a
physician or an osteopathic physician under the Medicine and Surgery
Practice Act.
(21) Power of attorney for health care means a record in which an
individual appoints an agent to make health-care decisions for the
individual.
(22) Reasonably available means being able to be contacted without
undue effort and being willing and able to act in a timely manner
considering the urgency of an individual's health-care situation. When
used to refer to an agent or default surrogate, the term includes being
willing and able to comply with the duties under section 17 of this act
in a timely manner considering the urgency of an individual's health-care
situation.
(23) Record means information:
-4-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(A) inscribed on a tangible medium; or
(B) stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in
perceivable form.
(24) Responsible health-care professional means:
(A) a health-care professional designated by an individual or the
individual's surrogate to have primary responsibility for the
individual's health care or for overseeing a course of treatment; or
(B) in the absence of a designation under subdivision (A) or, if the
professional designated under subdivision (A) is not reasonably
available, a health-care professional who has primary responsibility for
overseeing the individual's health care or for overseeing a course of
treatment.
(25) Sign means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a
record:
(A) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(B) to attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound, or process.
(26) State means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any other
territory or possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(27) Supported decision making means assistance, from one or more
persons of an individual's choosing, that helps the individual make or
communicate a decision, including by helping the individual understand
the nature and consequences of the decision.
(28) Surrogate means:
(A) an agent;
(B) a default surrogate; or
(C) a guardian authorized to make health-care decisions.
Sec. 3. (a) An individual has capacity for the purpose of the
Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act if the individual:
-5-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(1) is willing and able to communicate a decision independently or
with appropriate services, technological assistance, supported decision
making, or other reasonable accommodation; and
(2) in making or revoking:
(A) a health-care decision, understands the nature and consequences
of the decision, including the primary risks and benefits of the
decision;
(B) a health-care instruction, understands the nature and
consequences of the instruction, including the primary risks and benefits
of the choices expressed in the instruction; and
(C) an appointment of an agent under a health-care power of attorney
or identification of a default surrogate under subdivision (b)(1) of
section 12 of this act, recognizes the identity of the individual being
appointed or identified and understands the general nature of the
relationship of the individual making the appointment or identification
with the individual being appointed or identified.
(b) The right of an individual who has capacity to make a decision
about the individual's health care is not affected by whether the
individual creates or revokes an advance health-care directive.
Sec. 4. (a) An individual is presumed to have capacity to make or
revoke a health-care decision, health-care instruction, and power of
attorney for health care unless:
(1) a court has found the individual lacks capacity to do so; or
(2) the presumption is rebutted under subsection (b) of this
section.
(b) Subject to sections 5 and 6 of this act, a presumption under
subsection (a) of this section may be rebutted by a finding that the
individual lacks capacity:
(1) subject to subsection (c) of this section, made on the basis of
a contemporaneous examination by any of the following:
(A) a physician;
-6-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(B) a psychologist licensed or otherwise authorized to practice in
this state;
(C) an individual with training and expertise in the finding of lack
of capacity who is licensed or otherwise authorized to practice in this
state as:
(i) a physician assistant;
(ii) an advanced practice registered nurse; or
(iii) a social worker; or
(D) a responsible health-care professional not described in
subdivision (A), (B), or (C) if:
(i) the individual about whom the finding is to be made is
experiencing a health condition requiring a decision regarding health-
care treatment to be made promptly to avoid loss of life or serious harm
to the health of the individual; and
(ii) an individual listed in subdivision (A), (B), or (C) is not
reasonably available;
(2) made in accordance with accepted standards of the profession and
the scope of practice of the individual making the finding and to a
reasonable degree of certainty; and
(3) documented in a record signed by the individual making the
finding that includes an opinion of the cause, nature, extent, and
probable duration of the lack of capacity.
(c) The finding under subsection (b) of this section may not be made
by:
(1) a family member of the individual presumed to have capacity;
(2) the cohabitant of the individual or a descendant of the
cohabitant; or
(3) the individual's surrogate, a family member of the surrogate, or
a descendant of the surrogate.
(d) If the finding under subsection (b) of this section was based on
a condition the individual no longer has or a responsible health-care
-7-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
professional subsequently has good cause to believe the individual has
capacity, the individual is presumed to have capacity unless a court
finds the individual lacks capacity or the presumption is rebutted under
subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. 5. (a) As soon as reasonably feasible, an individual who makes
a finding under subsection (b) of section 4 of this act shall inform the
individual about whom the finding was made or the individual's
responsible health-care professional of the finding.
(b) As soon as reasonably feasible, a responsible health-care
professional who is informed of a finding under subsection (b) of section
4 of this act shall inform the individual about whom the finding was made
and the individual's surrogate.
(c) An individual found under subsection (b) of section 4 of this
act to lack capacity may object to the finding:
(1) by orally informing a responsible health-care professional;
(2) in a record provided to a responsible health-care professional
or the health-care institution in which the individual resides or is
receiving care; or
(3) by another act that clearly indicates the individual's
objection.
(d) If the individual objects under subsection (c) of this section,
the finding under subsection (b) of section 4 of this act is not
sufficient to rebut a presumption of capacity in subsection (a) of
section 4 of this act and the individual must be treated as having
capacity unless:
(1) the individual withdraws the objection;
(2) a court finds the individual lacks the presumed capacity;
(3) the individual is experiencing a health condition requiring a
decision regarding health-care treatment to be made promptly to avoid
imminent loss of life or serious harm to the health of the individual; or
(4) subject to subsection (e) of this section, the finding is
-8-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
confirmed by a second finding made by an individual authorized under
subdivision (b)(1) of section 4 of this act who:
(A) did not make the first finding;
(B) is not a family member of the individual who made the first
finding; and
(C) is not the cohabitant of the individual who made the first
finding or a descendant of the cohabitant.
(e) A second finding that the individual lacks capacity under
subdivision (d)(4) of this section is not sufficient to rebut the
presumption of capacity if the individual is requesting the provision or
continuation of life-sustaining treatment and the finding is being used
to make a decision to withhold or withdraw the treatment.
(f) As soon as reasonably feasible, a health-care professional who
is informed of an objection under subsection (c) of this section shall:
(1) communicate the objection to a responsible health-care
professional; and
(2) document the objection and the date of the objection in the
individual's medical record or communicate the objection and the date of
the objection to an administrator with responsibility for medical records
of the health-care institution providing health care to the individual,
who shall document the objection and the date of the objection in the
individual's medical record.
Sec. 6. (a) An individual found under subsection (b) of section 4
of this act to lack capacity, a responsible health-care professional, the
health-care institution providing health care to the individual, or a
person interested in the welfare of the individual may petition the
county court in the county in which the individual resides or is located
to determine whether the individual lacks capacity.
(b) The court in which a petition under subsection (a) of this
section is filed shall appoint legal counsel to represent the individual
if the individual does not have legal counsel. The court shall hear the
-9-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
petition as soon as possible, but not later than seven days after the
petition is filed. As soon as possible, but not later than seven days
after the hearing, the court shall determine whether the individual lacks
capacity. The court may determine the individual lacks capacity only if
the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the individual
lacks capacity.
Sec. 7. (a) An individual may create a health-care instruction that
expresses the individual's preferences for future health care, including
preferences regarding:
(1) health-care professionals or health-care institutions;
(2) how a health-care decision will be made and communicated;
(3) persons that should or should not be consulted regarding a
health-care decision;
(4) a person to serve as guardian for the individual if one is
appointed; and
(5) an individual to serve as a default surrogate.
(b) A health-care professional to whom an individual communicates or
provides an instruction under subsection (a) of this section shall
document the instruction and the date of the instruction in the
individual's medical record or communicate the instruction and date of
the instruction to an administrator with responsibility for medical
records of the health-care institution providing health care to the
individual, who shall document the instruction and the date of the
instruction in the individual's medical record.
(c) A health-care instruction made by an individual that conflicts
with an earlier health-care instruction made by the individual, including
an instruction documented in a medical order, revokes the earlier
instruction to the extent of the conflict.
(d) A health-care instruction may be in the same record as a power
of attorney for health care.
Sec. 8. (a) An individual may create a power of attorney for health
-10-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
care to appoint an agent to make health-care decisions for the
individual.
(b) An individual is disqualified from acting as agent for an
individual who lacks capacity to make health-care decisions if:
(1) a court finds that the potential agent poses a danger to the
individual's well-being, even if the court does not issue a protection
order against the potential agent; or
(2) the potential agent is an owner, operator, employee, or
contractor of a nursing home or an assisted-living facility as defined in
section 71-5903 in which the individual resides or is receiving care,
unless the owner, operator, employee, or contractor is a family member of
the individual, the cohabitant of the individual, or a descendant of the
cohabitant.
(c) A health-care decision made by an agent is effective without
judicial approval.
(d) A power of attorney for health care must be in a record, signed
by the individual creating the power, and signed by an adult witness who:
(1) reasonably believes the act of the individual to create the
power of attorney is voluntary and knowing;
(2) is not:
(A) the agent appointed by the individual;
(B) the agent's spouse or cohabitant;
(C) if the individual resides or is receiving care in a nursing home
or an assisted-living facility as defined in section 71-5903, the owner,
operator, employee, or contractor of the nursing home or assisted-living
facility; and
(3) is present when the individual signs the power of attorney or
when the individual represents that the power of attorney reflects the
individual's wishes.
(e) A witness under subsection (d) of this section is considered
present if the witness and the individual are:
-11-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(1) physically present in the same location;
(2) using electronic means that allow for real-time audio and visual
transmission and communication in real time to the same extent as if the
witness and the individual were physically present in the same location;
or
(3) able to speak to and hear each other in real time through audio
connection if:
(A) the identity of the individual is personally known to the
witness; or
(B) the witness is able to authenticate the identity of the
individual by receiving accurate answers from the individual that enable
the authentication.
(f) A power of attorney for health care may include a health-care
instruction.
Sec. 9. (a) An individual may create an advance health-care
directive that addresses only mental health care for the individual. The
directive may include a health-care instruction, a power of attorney for
health care, or both.
(b) A health-care instruction under this section may include the
individual's:
(1) general philosophy and objectives regarding mental health care;
and
(2) specific goals, preferences, and wishes regarding the provision,
withholding, or withdrawal of a form of mental health care, including:
(A) preferences regarding professionals, programs, and facilities;
(B) admission to a mental-health facility, including duration of
admission;
(C) preferences regarding medications;
(D) refusal to accept a specific type of mental health care,
including a medication; and
(E) preferences regarding crisis intervention.
-12-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(c) A power of attorney for health care under this section may
appoint an agent to make decisions only for mental health care.
(d) An individual may direct in an advance mental health-care
directive that, if the individual is experiencing a psychiatric or
psychological event specified in the directive, the individual may not
revoke the directive or a part of the directive.
(e) If an advance mental health-care directive includes a direction
under subsection (d) of this section, the advance mental health-care
directive must be in a record that is separate from any other advance
health-care directive created by the individual and signed by the
individual creating the advance mental health-care directive and at least
two adult witnesses who:
(1) attest that to the best of their knowledge the individual:
(A) understood the nature and consequences of the direction,
including its risks and benefits; and
(B) made the direction voluntarily and without coercion or undue
influence;
(2) are not:
(A) the agent appointed by the individual;
(B) the agent's spouse or cohabitant; and
(C) if the individual resides in a nursing home or an assisted-
living facility as defined in section 71-5903, the owner, operator,
employee, or contractor of the nursing home or assisted-living facility
as defined in section 71-5903; and
(3) are physically present in the same location as the individual.
Sec. 10. (a) If a direction in an advance mental health-care
directive of an individual conflicts with a direction in another advance
health-care directive of the individual, the later direction revokes the
earlier direction to the extent of the conflict.
(b) An appointment of an agent to make decisions only for mental
health care for an individual does not revoke an earlier appointment of
-13-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
an agent to make other health-care decisions for the individual. A later
appointment revokes the authority of an agent under the earlier
appointment to make decisions about mental health care unless otherwise
specified in the power of attorney making the later appointment.
(c) An appointment of an agent to make health-care decisions for an
individual other than decisions about mental health care made after
appointment of an agent authorized to make only mental health-care
decisions does not revoke the appointment of the agent authorized to make
only mental health-care decisions.
Sec. 11. The following form may be used to create an advance
health-care directive:
ADVANCE HEALTH-CARE DIRECTIVE
HOW YOU CAN USE THIS FORM
You can use this form if you wish to name someone to make health-
care decisions for you in case you cannot make decisions for yourself.
This is called giving the person a power of attorney for health care.
This person is called your Agent.
You can also use this form to state your wishes, preferences, and
goals for health care, and to say if you want to be an organ donor after
you die.
YOUR NAME AND DATE OF BIRTH
Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Date of birth: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
PART A: NAMING AN AGENT
This part lets you name someone else to make health-care decisions
for you. You may leave any item blank.
1. NAMING AN AGENT
I want the following person to make health-care decisions for me if
I cannot make decisions for myself:
Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Optional contact information (it is helpful to include information
-14-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
such as address, phone, and email):
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
2. NAMING AN ALTERNATE AGENT
I want the following person to make health-care decisions for me if
I cannot and my Agent is not able or available to make them for me:
Name: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Optional contact information (it is helpful to include information
such as address, phone, and email):
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
3. LIMITING YOUR AGENT'S AUTHORITY
I give my Agent the power to make all health-care decisions for me
if I cannot make those decisions for myself, except the following:
(If you do not add a limitation here, your Agent will be able to
make all health-care decisions that an Agent is permitted to make under
state law.)
PART B: HEALTH-CARE INSTRUCTIONS
This part lets you state your priorities for health care and to
state types of health care you do and do not want.
1. INSTRUCTIONS ABOUT LIFE-SUSTAINING TREATMENT
This section gives you the opportunity to say how you want your
Agent to act while making decisions for you. You may mark or initial each
choice. You also may leave any choice blank.
Treatment. Medical treatment needed to keep me alive but not needed
for comfort or any other purpose should (mark or initial all that apply):
(....) Always be given to me. (If you mark or initial this choice,
you should not mark or initial other choices in this "treatment"
section.)
(....) Not be given to me if I have a condition that is not curable
and is expected to cause my death soon, even if treated.
(....) Not be given to me if I am unconscious and I am not expected
to be conscious again.
-15-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(....) Not be given to me if I have a medical condition from which I
am not expected to recover that prevents me from communicating with
people I care about, caring for myself, and recognizing family and
friends.
(....) Other (write what you want or do not want):
Food and liquids. If I can't swallow and staying alive requires me
to get food or liquids through a tube or other means for the rest of my
life, then food or liquids should (mark or initial all that apply):
(....) Always be given to me. (If you mark or initial this choice,
you should not mark or initial other choices in this "food and liquids"
section.)
(....) Not be given to me if I have a condition that is not curable
and is expected to cause me to die soon, even if treated.
(....) Not be given to me if I am unconscious and am not expected to
be conscious again.
(....) Not be given to me if I have a medical condition from which I
am not expected to recover that prevents me from communicating with
people I care about, caring for myself, and recognizing family and
friends.
(....) Other (write what you want or do not want):
Pain relief. If I am in significant pain, care that will keep me
comfortable but is likely to shorten my life should (mark or initial all
that apply):
(....) Always be given to me. (If you mark or initial this choice,
you should not mark or initial other choices in this "pain relief"
section.)
(....) Never be given to me. (If you mark or initial this choice,
you should not mark or initial other choices in this "pain relief"
section.)
(....) Be given to me if I have a condition that is not curable and
is expected to cause me to die soon, even if treated.
-16-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(....) Be given to me if I am unconscious and am not expected to be
conscious again.
(....) Be given to me if I have a medical condition from which I am
not expected to recover that prevents me from communicating with people I
care about, caring for myself, and recognizing family and friends.
(....) Other (write what you want or do not want):
2. MY PRIORITIES
You can use this section to indicate what is important to you, and
what is not important to you. This information can help your Agent make
decisions for you if you cannot. It also helps others understand your
preferences.
You may mark or initial each choice. You also may leave any choice
blank.
Staying alive as long as possible even if I have substantial
physical limitations is:
(....) Very important
(....) Somewhat important
(....) Not important
Staying alive as long as possible even if I have substantial mental
limitations is:
(....) Very important
(....) Somewhat important
(....) Not important
Being free from significant pain is:
(....) Very important
(....) Somewhat important
(....) Not important
Being independent is:
(....) Very important
(....) Somewhat important
(....) Not important
-17-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
Having my Agent talk with my family before making decisions about my
care is:
(....) Very important
(....) Somewhat important
(....) Not important
Having my Agent talk with my friends before making decisions about
my care is:
(....) Very important
(....) Somewhat important
(....) Not important
3. OTHER INSTRUCTIONS
You can write in this section more information about your goals,
values, and preferences for treatment, including care you want or do not
want. You can also use this section to name anyone who you do not want to
make decisions for you under any conditions.
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
PART C: OPTIONAL SPECIAL POWERS AND GUIDANCE
This part lets you give your Agent additional powers, and to provide
more guidance about your wishes. You may mark or initial each choice. You
also may leave any choice blank.
1. OPTIONAL SPECIAL POWERS
My Agent can do the following things ONLY if I have marked or
initialed them below:
(....) Admit me as a voluntary patient to a facility for mental
health treatment for up to ...... days (write in the number of days you
want like 7, 14, 30 or another number).
(If I do not mark or initial this choice, my Agent MAY NOT admit me
as a voluntary patient to this type of facility.)
(....) Place me in a nursing home for more than one hundred days
even if my needs can be met somewhere else, I am not terminally ill, and
-18-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
I object.
(If I do not mark or initial this choice, my Agent MAY NOT do this.)
2. ACCESS TO MY HEALTH INFORMATION
My Agent may obtain, examine, and share information about my health
needs and health care if I am not able to make decisions for myself. If I
mark or initial below, my Agent may also do that at any time my Agent
thinks it will help me.
(....) I give my Agent permission to obtain, examine, and share
information about my health needs and health care whenever my Agent
thinks it will help me.
3. FLEXIBILITY FOR MY AGENT
Mark or initial below if you want to give your Agent flexibility in
following instructions you provide in this form. If you do not, your
Agent must follow the instructions even if your Agent thinks something
else would be better for you.
(....) I give my Agent permission to be flexible in applying these
instructions if my Agent thinks it would be in my best interest based on
what my Agent knows about me.
4. NOMINATION OF GUARDIAN
You can say who you would want as your guardian if you needed one. A
guardian is a person appointed by a court to make decisions for someone
who cannot make decisions. Filling this out does NOT mean you want or
need a guardian.
If a court appoints a guardian to make personal decisions for me, I
want the court to choose:
(....) My Agent named in this form. If my Agent cannot be a
guardian, I want the Alternate Agent named in this form.
(....) Other (write who you would want and their contact
information):
PART D: ORGAN DONATION
This part lets you donate your organs after you die. You may leave
-19-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
any item blank.
1. DONATION
You may mark or initial only one choice.
(....) I donate my organs, tissues, and other body parts after I
die, even if it requires maintaining treatments that conflict with other
instructions I have put in this form, EXCEPT for those I list below (list
any body parts you do NOT want to donate):
(....) I do not want my organs, tissues, or body parts donated to
anybody for any reason. (If you mark or initial this choice, you should
skip the "purpose of donation" section.)
2. PURPOSE OF DONATION
You may mark or initial all that apply. (If you do not mark or
initial any of the purposes below, your donation can be used for all of
them.)
Organs, tissues, or body parts that I donate may be used for:
(....) Transplant
(....) Therapy
(....) Research
(....) Education
(....) All of the above
PART E: SIGNATURES
YOUR SIGNATURE
Sign your name: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Today's date: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
City/Village and State (optional): . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
SIGNATURE OF A WITNESS
You need a witness if you are using this form to name an Agent. The
witness must be an adult and cannot be the person you are naming as Agent
or the Agent's spouse or someone the Agent lives with as a couple. If you
live or are receiving care in a nursing home or an assisted living
facility, the witness cannot be an employee or contractor of the home or
-20-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
someone who owns or runs the home.
Name of Witness: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Signature of Witness: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
(Only sign as a witness if you think the person signing above is
doing it voluntarily.)
Date witness signed: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
PART F: INFORMATION FOR AGENTS
1. If this form names you as an Agent, you can make decisions about
health care for the person who named you when the person cannot make
their own.
2. If you make a decision for the person, follow any instructions
the person gave, including any in this form.
3. If you do not know what the person would want, make the decision
that you think is in the person's best interest. To figure out what is in
the person's best interest, consider the person's values, preferences,
and goals if you know them or can learn them. Some of these preferences
may be in this form. You should also consider any behavior or
communication from the person that indicates what the person currently
wants.
4. If this form names you as an Agent, you can also get and share
the person's health information. But unless the person has said so in
this form, you can get or share this information only when the person
cannot make decisions about the person's health care.
Sec. 12. (a) A default surrogate may make a health-care decision
for an individual who lacks capacity to make health-care decisions and
for whom an agent, or guardian authorized to make health-care decisions,
has not been appointed or is not reasonably available.
(b) Unless the individual has an advance health-care directive that
indicates otherwise, a member of the following classes, in descending
order of priority, who is reasonably available and not disqualified under
section 14 of this act, may act as a default surrogate for the
-21-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
individual:
(1) an adult the individual has identified, other than in a power of
attorney for health care, to make a health-care decision for the
individual if the individual cannot make the decision;
(2) the individual's spouse, unless:
(A) a petition for annulment, divorce, dissolution of marriage,
legal separation, or termination has been filed and not dismissed or
withdrawn;
(B) a decree of annulment, divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal
separation, or termination has been issued;
(C) the individual and the spouse have agreed in a record to a legal
separation; or
(D) the spouse has abandoned the individual for more than one year;
(3) the individual's adult child or parent;
(4) the individual's cohabitant;
(5) the individual's adult sibling;
(6) the individual's adult grandchild or grandparent;
(7) an adult not listed in subdivisions (1) through (6) who has
assisted the individual with supported decision making routinely during
the preceding six months;
(8) the individual's adult stepchild not listed in subdivisions (1)
through (7) whom the individual actively parented during the stepchild's
minor years and with whom the individual has an ongoing relationship; or
(9) an adult not listed in subdivisions (1) through (8) who has
exhibited special care and concern for the individual and is familiar
with the individual's personal values.
(c) A responsible health-care professional may require an individual
who assumes authority to act as a default surrogate to provide a
declaration in a record under penalty of perjury stating facts and
circumstances reasonably sufficient to establish the authority.
(d) If a responsible health-care professional reasonably determines
-22-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
that an individual who assumed authority to act as a default surrogate is
not willing or able to comply with a duty under section 17 of this act or
fails to comply with the duty in a timely manner, the professional may
recognize the individual next in priority under subsection (b) of this
section as the default surrogate.
(e) A health-care decision made by a default surrogate is effective
without judicial approval.
Sec. 13. (a) A default surrogate who assumes authority under
section 12 of this act shall inform a responsible health-care
professional if two or more members of a class under subsection (b) of
section 12 of this act have assumed authority to act as default
surrogates and the members do not agree on a health-care decision.
(b) A responsible health-care professional shall comply with the
decision of a majority of the members of the class with highest priority
under subsection (b) of section 12 of this act who have communicated
their views to the professional and the professional reasonably believes
are acting consistent with their duties under section 17 of this act.
(c) If a responsible health-care professional is informed that the
members of the class who have communicated their views to the
professional are evenly divided concerning the health-care decision, the
professional shall make a reasonable effort to solicit the views of
members of the class who are reasonably available but have not yet
communicated their views to the professional. The professional, after the
solicitation, shall comply with the decision of a majority of the members
who have communicated their views to the professional and the
professional reasonably believes are acting consistent with their duties
under section 17 of this act.
(d) If the class remains evenly divided after the effort is made
under subsection (c) of this section, the health-care decision must be
made as provided by other law of this state regarding the treatment of an
individual who is found to lack capacity.
-23-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
Sec. 14. (a) An individual for whom a health-care decision would be
made may disqualify another individual from acting as default surrogate
for the first individual. The disqualification must be in a record signed
by the first individual or communicated verbally or nonverbally to the
individual being disqualified, another individual, or a responsible
health-care professional. Disqualification under this subsection is
effective even if made by an individual who lacks capacity to make an
advance directive if the individual clearly communicates a desire that
the individual being disqualified not make health-care decisions for the
individual.
(b) An individual is disqualified from acting as a default surrogate
for an individual who lacks capacity to make health-care decisions if:
(1) a court finds that the potential default surrogate poses a
danger to the individual's well-being, even if the court does not issue a
protection order against the potential surrogate;
(2) the potential default surrogate is an owner, operator, employee,
or contractor of a nursing home or an assisted-living facility as defined
in section 71-5903 in which the individual is residing or receiving care
unless the owner, operator, employee, or contractor is a family member of
the individual, the cohabitant of the individual, or a descendant of the
cohabitant; or
(3) the potential default surrogate refuses to provide a timely
declaration under subsection (c) of section 12 of this act.
Sec. 15. (a) An individual may revoke the appointment of an agent,
the designation of a default surrogate, or a health-care instruction in
whole or in part, unless:
(1) a court finds the individual lacks capacity to do so;
(2) the individual is found under subsection (b) of section 4 of
this act to lack capacity to do so and, if the individual objects to the
finding, the finding is confirmed under subdivision (d)(4) of section 5
of this act; or
-24-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(3) the individual created an advance mental health-care directive
that includes the provision under subsection (d) of section 9 of this act
and the individual is experiencing the psychiatric or psychological event
specified in the directive.
(b) Revocation under subsection (a) of this section may be by any
act of the individual that clearly indicates that the individual intends
to revoke the appointment, designation, or instruction, including an oral
statement to a health-care professional.
(c) Except as provided in section 10 of this act, an advance health-
care directive of an individual that conflicts with another advance
health-care directive of the individual revokes the earlier directive to
the extent of the conflict.
(d) Unless otherwise provided in an individual's advance health-care
directive appointing an agent, the appointment of a spouse of an
individual as agent for the individual is revoked if:
(1) a petition for annulment, divorce, dissolution of marriage,
legal separation, or termination has been filed and not dismissed or
withdrawn;
(2) a decree of annulment, divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal
separation, or termination has been issued;
(3) the individual and the spouse have agreed in a record to a legal
separation; or
(4) the spouse has abandoned the individual for more than one year.
Sec. 16. (a) An advance health-care directive created outside this
state is valid if it complies with:
(1) the law of the state specified in the directive or, if a state
is not specified, the state in which the individual created the
directive; or
(2) the Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act.
(b) A person may assume without inquiry that an advance health-care
directive is genuine, valid, and still in effect, and may implement and
-25-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
rely on it, unless the person has good cause to believe the directive is
invalid or has been revoked.
(c) An advance health-care directive, revocation of a directive, or
a signature on a directive or revocation may not be denied legal effect
or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form.
(d) Evidence relating to an advance health-care directive,
revocation of a directive, or a signature on a directive or revocation
may not be excluded in a proceeding solely because the evidence is in
electronic form.
(e) The Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act does not affect the
validity of an electronic record or signature that is valid under the
Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.
(f) If the Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act conflicts with other
law of this state relating to the creation, execution, implementation, or
revocation of an advance health-care directive, the Uniform Health-Care
Decisions Act prevails.
Sec. 17. (a) An agent or default surrogate has a fiduciary duty to
the individual for whom the agent or default surrogate is acting when
exercising or purporting to exercise a power under section 18 of this
act.
(b) An agent or default surrogate shall make a health-care decision
in accordance with the direction of the individual in an advance health-
care directive and other goals, preferences, and wishes of the individual
to the extent known or reasonably ascertainable by the agent or default
surrogate.
(c) If there is not a direction in an advance health-care directive
and the goals, preferences, and wishes of the individual regarding a
health-care decision are not known or reasonably ascertainable by the
agent or default surrogate, the agent or default surrogate shall make the
decision in accordance with the agent's or default surrogate's
determination of the individual's best interest.
-26-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(d) In determining the individual's best interest under subsection
(c) of this section, the agent or default surrogate shall:
(1) give primary consideration to the individual's contemporaneous
communications, including verbal and nonverbal expressions;
(2) consider the individual's values to the extent known or
reasonably ascertainable by the agent or default surrogate; and
(3) consider the risks and benefits of the potential health-care
decision.
(e) As soon as reasonably feasible, an agent or default surrogate
who is informed of a revocation of an advance health-care directive or
disqualification of the agent or default surrogate shall communicate the
revocation or disqualification to a responsible health-care professional.
Sec. 18. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section,
the power of an agent or default surrogate commences when the individual
is found under subsection (b) of section 4 of this act or by a court to
lack capacity to make a health-care decision. The power ceases if the
individual later is found to have capacity to make a health-care
decision, or the individual objects under subsection (c) of section 5 of
this act to the finding of lack of capacity under subsection (b) of
section 4 of this act. The power resumes if:
(1) the power ceased because the individual objected under
subsection (c) of section 5 of this act; and
(2) the finding of lack of capacity is confirmed under subdivision
(d)(4) of section 5 of this act or a court finds that the individual
lacks capacity to make a health-care decision.
(b) An agent or default surrogate may request, receive, examine,
copy, and consent to the disclosure of medical and other health-care
information about the individual if the individual would have the right
to request, receive, examine, copy, or consent to the disclosure of the
information.
(c) A power of attorney for health care may provide that the power
-27-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
of an agent under subsection (b) of this section commences on
appointment.
(d) If no other person is authorized to do so, an agent or default
surrogate may apply for public or private health insurance and benefits
on behalf of the individual. An agent or default surrogate who may apply
for insurance and benefits does not, solely by reason of the power, have
a duty to apply for the insurance or benefits.
(e) An agent or default surrogate may not consent to voluntary
admission of the individual to a facility for mental health treatment
unless:
(1) voluntary admission is specifically authorized by the individual
in an advance health-care directive in a record; and
(2) the admission is for no more than the maximum of the number of
days specified in the directive or [insert the number of days a guardian
may commit an adult subject to guardianship without using the state's
involuntary commitment procedure], whichever is less.
(f) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, an agent
or default surrogate may not consent to placement of the individual in a
nursing home if the placement is intended to be for more than one hundred
days if:
(1) an alternative living arrangement is reasonably feasible;
(2) the individual objects to the placement; or
(3) the individual is not terminally ill.
(g) If specifically authorized by the individual in an advance
health-care directive in a record, an agent or default surrogate may
consent to placement of the individual in a nursing home for more than
one hundred days even if:
(1) an alternative living arrangement is reasonably feasible;
(2) the individual objects to the placement; and
(3) the individual is not terminally ill.
Sec. 19. (a) If an individual has a long-term disability requiring
-28-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
routine treatment by artificial nutrition, hydration, or mechanical
ventilation and a history of using the treatment without objection, an
agent or default surrogate may not consent to withhold or withdraw the
treatment unless:
(1) the treatment is not necessary to sustain the individual's life
or maintain the individual's well-being;
(2) the individual has expressly authorized the withholding or
withdrawal in a health-care instruction that has not been revoked; or
(3) the individual has experienced a major reduction in health or
functional ability from which the individual is not expected to recover,
even with other appropriate treatment, and the individual has not:
(A) given a direction inconsistent with withholding or withdrawal;
or
(B) communicated by verbal or nonverbal expression a desire for
artificial nutrition, hydration, or mechanical ventilation.
(b) A default surrogate may not make a health-care decision if,
under other law of this state, the decision:
(1) may not be made by a guardian; or
(2) may be made by a guardian only if the court appointing the
guardian specifically authorizes the guardian to make the decision.
Sec. 20. (a) An individual in a power of attorney for health care
may appoint multiple individuals as co-agents. Unless the power of
attorney provides otherwise, each co-agent may exercise independent
authority.
(b) An individual in a power of attorney for health care may appoint
one or more individuals to act as alternate agents if a predecessor agent
resigns, dies, becomes disqualified, is not reasonably available, or
otherwise is unwilling or unable to act as agent.
(c) Unless the power of attorney provides otherwise, an alternate
agent has the same authority as the original agent:
(1) at any time the original agent is not reasonably available or is
-29-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
otherwise unwilling or unable to act, for the duration of the
unavailability, unwillingness, or inability to act; or
(2) if the original agent and all other predecessor agents have
resigned or died or are disqualified from acting as agent.
Sec. 21. (a) A responsible health-care professional who is aware
that an individual has been found to lack capacity to make a decision
shall make a reasonable effort to determine if the individual has a
surrogate.
(b) If possible before implementing a health-care decision made by a
surrogate, a responsible health-care professional as soon as reasonably
feasible shall communicate to the individual the decision made and the
identity of the surrogate.
(c) A responsible health-care professional who makes or is informed
of a finding that an individual lacks capacity to make a health-care
decision or no longer lacks capacity, or that other circumstances exist
that affect a health-care instruction or the authority of a surrogate, as
soon as reasonably feasible, shall:
(1) document the finding or circumstance in the individual's medical
record; and
(2) if possible, communicate to the individual and the individual's
surrogate the finding or circumstance and that the individual may object
under subsection (c) of section 5 of this act to the finding under
subsection (b) of section 4 of this act.
(d) A responsible health-care professional who is informed that an
individual has created or revoked an advance health-care directive, or
that a surrogate for an individual has been appointed, designated, or
disqualified, shall:
(1) document the information as soon as reasonably feasible in the
individual's medical record; and
(2) if evidence of the directive, revocation, appointment,
designation, or disqualification is in a record, request a copy and, on
-30-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
receipt, cause the copy to be included in the individual's medical
record.
(e) Except as provided in subsections (f) and (g) of this section, a
health-care professional or health-care institution providing health care
to an individual shall comply with:
(1) a health-care instruction given by the individual regarding the
individual's health care;
(2) a reasonable interpretation by the individual's surrogate of an
instruction given by the individual; and
(3) a health-care decision for the individual made by the
individual's surrogate in accordance with sections 17 and 18 of this act
to the same extent as if the decision had been made by the individual at
a time when the individual had capacity.
(f) A health-care professional or a health-care institution may
refuse to provide health care consistent with a health-care instruction
or health-care decision if:
(1) the instruction or decision is contrary to a policy of the
health-care institution providing care to the individual that is based
expressly on reasons of conscience and the policy was timely communicated
to the individual or to the individual's surrogate;
(2) the care would require health care that is not available to the
professional or institution; or
(3) compliance with the instruction or decision would:
(A) require the professional to provide care that is contrary to the
professional's religious belief or moral conviction if other law permits
the professional to refuse to provide care for that reason;
(B) require the professional or institution to provide care that is
contrary to generally accepted health-care standards applicable to the
professional or institution; or
(C) violate a court order or other law.
(g) A health-care professional or health-care institution that
-31-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
refuses to provide care under subsection (f) of this section shall:
(1) as soon as reasonably feasible, inform the individual, if
possible, and the individual's surrogate of the refusal;
(2) immediately make a reasonable effort to transfer the individual
to another health-care professional or health-care institution that is
willing to comply with the instruction or decision; and
(3) either:
(A) if care is refused under subdivision (f)(1) or (2) of this
section, provide life-sustaining care and care needed to keep or make the
individual comfortable, consistent with accepted medical standards to the
extent feasible, until a transfer is made; or
(B) if care is refused under subdivision (f)(3) of this section,
provide life-sustaining care and care needed to keep or make the
individual comfortable, consistent with accepted medical standards, until
a transfer is made or, if the professional or institution reasonably
believes that a transfer cannot be made, for at least ten days after the
refusal.
Sec. 22. (a) A guardian may refuse to comply with or revoke the
individual's advance health-care directive only if the court appointing
the guardian expressly orders the noncompliance or revocation.
(b) Unless a court orders otherwise, a health-care decision made by
an agent appointed by an individual subject to guardianship prevails over
a decision of the guardian appointed for the individual.
Sec. 23. (a) A health-care professional or health-care institution
acting in good faith is not subject to civil or criminal liability or to
discipline for unprofessional conduct for:
(1) complying with a health-care decision made for an individual by
another person if compliance is based on a reasonable belief that the
person has authority to make the decision, including a decision to
withhold or withdraw health care;
(2) refusing to comply with a health-care decision made for an
-32-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
individual by another person if the refusal is based on a reasonable
belief that the person lacked authority or capacity to make the decision;
(3) complying with an advance health-care directive based on a
reasonable belief that the directive is valid;
(4) refusing to comply with an advance health-care directive based
on a reasonable belief that the directive is not valid, including a
reasonable belief that the directive was not made by the individual or,
after its creation, was substantively altered by a person other than the
individual who created it;
(5) determining that an individual who otherwise might be authorized
to act as an agent or default surrogate is not reasonably available; or
(6) complying with an individual's direction under subsection (d) of
section 9 of this act.
(b) An agent, default surrogate, or individual with a reasonable
belief that the individual is an agent or a default surrogate is not
subject to civil or criminal liability or to discipline for
unprofessional conduct for a health-care decision made in a good faith
effort to comply with section 17 of this act.
Sec. 24. (a) A person may not:
(1) intentionally falsify, in whole or in part, an advance health-
care directive;
(2) for the purpose of frustrating the intent of the individual who
created an advance health-care directive or with knowledge that doing so
is likely to frustrate the intent:
(A) intentionally conceal, deface, obliterate, or delete the
directive or a revocation of the directive without consent of the
individual who created or revoked the directive; or
(B) intentionally withhold knowledge of the existence or revocation
of the directive from a responsible health-care professional or health-
care institution providing health care to the individual who created or
revoked the directive;
-33-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(3) coerce or fraudulently induce an individual to create, revoke,
or refrain from creating or revoking an advance health-care directive or
a part of a directive; or
(4) require or prohibit the creation or revocation of an advance
health-care directive as a condition for providing health care.
(b) An individual who is the subject of conduct prohibited under
subsection (a) of this section, or the individual's estate, has a cause
of action against a person that violates subsection (a) of this section
for statutory damages of twenty-five thousand dollars or actual damages
resulting from the violation, whichever is greater.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, an individual who
makes a health-care instruction, or the individual's estate, has a cause
of action against a health-care professional or health-care institution
that intentionally violates section 21 of this act for statutory damages
of fifty thousand dollars or actual damages resulting from the violation,
whichever is greater.
(d) A health-care professional who is an emergency medical responder
is not liable under subsection (c) of this section for a violation of
subsection (e) of section 21 of this act if:
(1) the violation occurs in the course of providing care to an
individual experiencing a health condition for which the professional
reasonably believes the care was appropriate to avoid imminent loss of
life or serious harm to the individual;
(2) the failure to comply is consistent with accepted standards of
the profession of the professional; and
(3) the provision of care does not begin in a health-care
institution in which the individual resides or was receiving care.
(e) In an action under this section, a prevailing plaintiff may
recover reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and other reasonable
litigation expenses.
(f) A cause of action or remedy under this section is in addition to
-34-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
any cause of action or remedy under other law.
Sec. 25. (a) A physical or electronic copy of an advance health-
care directive, revocation of an advance health-care directive, or
appointment, designation, or disqualification of a surrogate has the same
effect as the original.
(b) An individual may create a certified physical copy of an advance
health-care directive or revocation of an advance health-care directive
that is in electronic form by affirming under penalty of perjury that the
physical copy is a complete and accurate copy of the directive or
revocation.
Sec. 26. (a) On petition of an individual, the individual's
surrogate, a health-care professional or health-care institution
providing health care to the individual, or a person interested in the
welfare of the individual, the court may:
(1) enjoin implementation of a health-care decision made by an agent
or default surrogate on behalf of the individual, on a finding that the
decision is inconsistent with section 17 or 18 of this act;
(2) enjoin an agent from making a health-care decision for the
individual, on a finding that the individual's appointment of the agent
has been revoked or the agent:
(A) is disqualified under subsection (b) of section 8 of this act;
(B) is unwilling or unable to comply with section 17 of this act; or
(C) poses a danger to the individual's well-being;
(3) enjoin another individual from acting as a default surrogate, on
a finding that the other individual acting as a default surrogate did not
comply with section 12 of this act or the other individual:
(A) is disqualified under section 14 of this act;
(B) is unwilling or unable to comply with section 17 of this act; or
(C) poses a danger to the first individual's well-being; or
(4) order implementation of a health-care decision made:
(A) by and for the individual; or
-35-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
(B) by an agent or default surrogate who is acting in compliance
with the powers and duties of the agent or default surrogate.
(b) In the Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act, advocacy for the
withholding or withdrawal of health care or mental health care from an
individual is not itself evidence that an agent or default surrogate, or
a potential agent or default surrogate, poses a danger to the
individual's well-being.
(c) A proceeding under this section is governed by [cite to the
state's rules of procedure or statutory provisions governing expedited
proceedings and proceedings affecting persons found or alleged to lack
capacity].
Sec. 27. (a) The Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act does not
authorize mercy killing, assisted suicide, or euthanasia.
(b) The Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act does not affect other law
of this state governing treatment for mental illness of an individual
involuntarily committed for treatment under the Nebraska Mental Health
Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act.
(c) Death of an individual caused by withholding or withdrawing
health care in accordance with the Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act does
not constitute a suicide or homicide or legally impair or invalidate a
policy of insurance or an annuity providing a death benefit,
notwithstanding any term of the policy or annuity.
(d) The Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act does not create a
presumption concerning the intention of an individual who has not created
an advance health-care directive.
(e) An advance health-care directive created before, on, or after
the effective date of this act must be interpreted in accordance with
other law of this state, excluding the state's choice-of-law rules, at
the time the directive is implemented.
Sec. 28. In applying and construing the Uniform Health-Care
Decisions Act, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the
-36-

LB66 LB66
2025 2025
law among jurisdictions that enact it.
Sec. 29. (a) An advance health-care directive created before the
effective date of this act is valid if it complies with the Uniform
Health-Care Decisions Act or complied at the time of creation with the
law of the state in which it was created.
(b) The Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act does not affect the
validity or effect of an act done before the effective date of this act.
(c) An individual who assumed authority to act as default surrogate
before the effective date of this act may continue to act as default
surrogate until the individual for whom the default surrogate is acting
has capacity or the default surrogate is disqualified, whichever occurs
first.
Sec. 30. The Uniform Health-Care Decisions Act applies to an
advance health-care directive created before, on, or after the effective
date of this act.
Sec. 31. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
-37-